Hawaii statutes.
§132-16 State fire council; composition;
functions. (a) There is established a state fire council which shall be
placed within the department of labor and industrial relations for
administrative purposes. The state fire council shall consist of the fire
chiefs of the counties. The state fire council may appoint an advisory
committee to assist it in carrying out its functions under this chapter. The
advisory committee may include the heads of the various county building
departments, a licensed architect recommended by the Hawaii Society of the
American Institute of Architects, a licensed electrical engineer and a licensed
mechanical engineer recommended by the Consulting Engineers Council of Hawaii,
a representative of the Hawaii Rating Bureau, a representative of the Hawaii
firefighters association, representatives of the county fire departments, and
such other members of the public as the state fire council may determine can
best assist it. The state fire council shall elect a chairperson from among its
members.

(b) In addition to adopting a state fire code
pursuant to section 132-3, the state fire council shall:

(1) Administer the requirements for reduced ignition
propensity cigarettes, in accordance with chapter 132C; and

(2) Serve as a focal point through which all
applications to the federal government for federal grant assistance for
fire-related projects shall be made. Upon the receipt of any such federal
grants, the state fire council shall administer those federal grants.

(c) The state fire council may also:

(1) Appoint advisory committees comprised of
representatives from each county fire department to assist in drafting the
state fire code and coordinating statewide training, data collection, and
contingency planning needs for firefighters;

(2) Advise and assist the county fire departments
where appropriate, may prescribe standard procedures and forms relating to
inspections, investigations, and reporting of fires, may approve plans for
cooperation among the county fire departments, and may advise the governor and
the legislature with respect to fire prevention and protection, life safety,
and any other functions or activities for which the various county fire
departments are generally responsible; and

(3) Establish, in conformance with the adopted state
fire code and nationally recognized standards, statewide qualifications and
procedures, to be administered by the county fire departments, for testing,
certifying, and credentialing individuals who perform maintenance and testing
of portable fire extinguishers, fire protection systems, and fire alarm
systems; provided that the county fire departments may establish and charge
reasonable certification fees.

(d) The state fire council may adopt rules
pursuant to chapter 91 for purposes of this section. [L 1978, c 241, §2(19); am
L 1985, c 103, §1; am L 1987, c 271, §1; gen ch 1992; am L 2000, c 12, §1; am L
2005, c 190, §2; am L 2008, c 218, §2; am L 2014, c 165, §2]

Note

The L 2008, c 218 amendment to subsection (b) is repealed if
a federal reduced cigarette ignition propensity standard that preempts L 2008,
c 218 is adopted and becomes effective. L 2008, c 218, §3.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next